Utah statutes.
23-14-14.1.   Wolf Depredation and Management Restricted Account -- Interest
-- Use of contributions and interest.
(1)  There is created within the General Fund the Wolf Depredation and
Management Restricted Account.
(2)  The account shall be funded by contributions deposited into the Wolf
Depredation and Management Restricted Account in accordance with Section
59-10-1309.
(3) (a)  The Wolf Depredation and Management Restricted Account shall earn
interest.
(b)  Interest earned on the Wolf Depredation and Management Restricted Account
shall be deposited into the Wolf Depredation and Management Restricted
Account.
(4) (a)  Subject to Subsection (4)(b) and except as provided in Subsection
(5), contributions and interest deposited into the Wolf Depredation and
Management Restricted Account shall be used by the Division of Wildlife
Resources for:
(i)  payments for livestock depredation by wolves; or
(ii)  wolf management.
(b)  Contributions and interest deposited into the Wolf Depredation and
Management Restricted Account may be used for the purposes described in
Subsection (4)(a) only to the extent permitted by federal law.
(5)  Any contributions and interest remaining on June 30, 2009 in the Wolf
Depredation and Management Restricted Account shall be deposited into the
Agricultural and Wildlife Damage Prevention Account created in Section
4-23-7.5.
